Utah statutes.
75-3-408.   Formal testacy proceedings -- Will construction -- Effect of
final order in another jurisdiction.
A final order of a court of another state determining testacy, the validity,
or construction of a will, made in a proceeding involving notice to and an
opportunity for contest by all interested persons must be accepted as
determinative by the courts of this state if it includes, or is based upon, a
finding that the decedent was domiciled at his death in the state where the
order was made.
